California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(e) “Grievance reviewer” means an individual with subject matter expertise related to the grievance who reviews the grieved issue, including information submitted by grievant, and who was not involved in the situation or decisionmaking that resulted in the grievance, or a subordinate of a person so involved.

(f) “Grievant” means a person who files a grievance pursuant to this chapter and who meets any of the following descriptions:

(1) An individual with a developmental or intellectual disability who has applied for, been determined to be eligible to receive, or receives services from a regional center or a state-operated facility.

(2) The authorized representative of a person described in
 paragraph (1).

(3) (A) Any other individual who files a grievance pursuant to this chapter, with the prior written consent of a person described in paragraph (1) or (2), which meets the requirements for the release of information under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act Privacy Rule in Part 164 (commencing with Section 164.102) of Subchapter C of Subtitle A of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(B) A service provider shall not file a grievance that would be a conflict of interest, as established by the department.

(g) “Preferred language” means the language preferred by the grievant.

(h) “Resolution plan” means a written summary of the grievance investigation and actions to be taken by a regional
 center, service provider, or state-operated facility to address the grievance and includes all of the following:

(1) A general description of the reason for the grievance.

(2) The date the grievance was received.

(3) The date of each grievance review or, if applicable, grievance review meeting.

(4) The resolution of the grievance, as applicable.

(5) The date of resolution of the grievance, if applicable.

(6) The name of the individual with a developmental or intellectual disability who has applied for, been determined to be eligible to receive, or actually receives, services from a regional center or a state-operated facility
 for whom the grievance was filed.

(i) “Retaliatory action” minimally means an adverse action, threat, intimidation, coercion, or harassment, and as a definition is subject to further development pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 4894.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 48.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4891.

(a) A grievant desiring to file a grievance shall submit the grievance to the department. A grievance may be submitted online, orally, or in writing by the grievant in accordance with this chapter. Upon receipt of a grievance, the grievant shall receive an acknowledgment from the department of its receipt.

(b) All applicants or individuals eligible for services, or if appropriate, their authorized representative, shall be notified in writing in their preferred language of the right to submit a grievance pursuant to this chapter from the regional center or state-operated facility upon intake or when an individual program plan is developed or modified, or upon request. The written notice shall, in plain language, explain the difference between
 the grievance process under this chapter and appeals regarding eligibility and service issues that are appropriate for the state hearing process pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 4710) of Chapter 7.

(c) Upon request, the department and regional centers shall provide grievants with reasonable assistance in completing forms, taking procedural steps, and appropriately filing a grievance with the department.

(d) The department shall do all of the following within five days of receiving a grievance submission:

(1) Review the submission to determine if it meets the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter.

(2) If the submission meets the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter, the department shall refer the grievance to the
 associated regional center or state-operated facility to address.

(3) If the submission contains an indication of serious harm or risk of serious harm to an individual, the department shall expedite a referral to the regional center or state-operated facility for appropriate action.

(4) If the submission does not meet the definition of a grievance pursuant to this chapter, the department shall promptly provide reasonable assistance to redirect the matter to other appropriate processes or entities to further pursue the matter.

(e) Regional centers, state-operated facilities, and service providers shall not take punitive or retaliatory action or threat of action against a grievant, an individual served, an authorized representative, a witness, or any person who assists in or participates in a grievance under this
 chapter.

(f) Upon receipt of a grievance, the regional center or state-operated facility shall assign a grievance reviewer, with priority for review if the department determined there is an indication of serious harm or risk of serious harm to the individual pursuant to subdivision (d). The regional center or state-operated facility shall provide the grievant a reasonable opportunity, face-to-face including through the use of audio or video technology, or in writing, to present evidence, information, or testimony and make legal and factual arguments related to their grievance.

(g) The grievant shall be provided a copy of, or access to, the case file by the regional center or state-operated facility free of charge and within three business days from the date the grievance was referred by the department. If the grievant requests access to the consumer records outside of the case
 file specific to their grievance, they may request access pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 4725) of Chapter 7.

(h) The regional center or state-operated facility’s grievance reviewer shall review the grievance and send a resolution plan to the grievant, the department, and, if named in the grievance, the service provider. The regional center or state-operated facility’s grievance reviewer shall produce and sign the resolution plan within 60 days of the date that the grievance was referred by the department.

(i) Resolutions included in the resolution plan shall be reasonably appropriate to resolve the grievance, and, if appropriate, prevent reoccurrence. Resolutions may include, but are not limited to, convening the individual program planning team, ongoing communication or meetings with the regional center or state-operated facility, completion of any identified
 steps in the resolution plan, requiring corrective action, including training, policy or implementation changes, reporting or supervision necessary to prevent recurrence, or a statement regarding the outcome of an investigation of alleged noncompliance with the home- and community-based settings rules.

(j) The department, regional center, or state-operated facility may extend the timeframe specified in subdivision (h) up to 14 days if the grievant requests the extension or if the department, regional center, or state-operated facility documents that there is need for additional information and how the delay is in the grievant’s best interest. If the department, regional center, or state-operated facility extends the timeframe not at the request of the individual or grievant, it shall do both of the following:

(1) Make reasonable efforts to give the grievant prompt oral notice of
 the delay.

(2) Within two days of determining that there is a need for a delay, but no later than 60 days from receipt of the grievance, give the grievant written notice of the reason for the decision to extend the timeframe.

(k) A grievant who is not satisfied with the regional center’s or state-operated facility’s resolution plan may request a review by the department within 15 days of receiving the resolution plan. An extension for good cause may be granted by the department, as defined in department directive or regulations.

(l) If a review is requested pursuant to subdivision (k), the department shall review the resolution plan for relative appropriateness to the grievance and, within 21 days, shall notify the grievant, regional center or state-operated facility, and, if named in the grievance, the
 service provider, of its determination. The department’s determination may affirm the resolution plan, remand the matter to the regional center or state-operated facility with written instructions for any necessary revision, or require one or more corrective actions consistent with the intent and provisions of this chapter.

(m) The department shall annually review a sample of resolution plans for each regional center and state-operated facility.

(n) (1) The department shall annually post the deidentified results of the review described in subdivision (m) on its internet website.

(2) The department shall use the review to determine operational or systemic problems within a regional center, state-operated facility, or internal to the department. The department shall identify and implement options
 to address identified issues, which may include, but are not limited to, providing technical assistance or training to regional centers or state-operated facilities, requiring corrective action plans with measurable outcomes and timelines, conducting monitoring or audit activities, or identifying potential policy changes. If the department identifies repeated failures to cure or meaningfully respond to substantially similar grievances, the department may, in its discretion, take additional action consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 4629.

(3) The department’s review and use of grievance data pursuant to this section is independent of, and in addition to, the resolution of any individual grievance. The department may initiate monitoring, oversight, or enforcement actions under this section regardless of how a particular grievance was resolved.

(o) The department shall
 annually post, at a minimum, all of the following information on its internet website:

(1) The number of grievances received by the department annually.

(2) The average number of days for each regional center or state-operated facility to respond to grievances.

(3) The number of grievances that resulted in a request for department review.

(4) The percentages of grievances that were resolved in favor of the grievant, the entity about whom the grievance was filed, or some combination thereof.

(5) The number and type of grievances that resulted in the department providing the regional center or state-operated facility technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (n).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 48.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4892.

(a) The department shall convene stakeholders and legislative staff no later than August 1, 2027, in order to receive input and feedback regarding the implementation of this chapter.

(b) (1) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the implementation of this chapter, including stakeholder input received pursuant to subdivision (a), no later than December 1, 2027.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on
 January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 48.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4893.

This chapter applies to any grievance filed on or after February 1, 2027. Any complaint filed prior to February 1, 2027, shall continue to be addressed pursuant to the provisions of Section 4731, as it read immediately preceding its becoming inoperative by the act that added this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 48.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4894.

(a) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of written directives or similar instructions, after consultation with individuals, families, caregivers, service providers, regional centers, and advocates. These directives and instructions shall maintain compliance with federal requirements and guidance issued by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and, prior to the adoption of regulations, shall consider all of the following:

(1) Procedures for department screening of grievances, including redirection to
 the appropriate process when a submission is not a grievance, and safeguards to ensure that matters subject to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) are not improperly diverted from the appeals process.

(2) Procedures for identifying grievances involving serious harm, risk of serious harm, and for requiring timely interim action when necessary to protect the health, safety, rights, or community living of the individuals.

(3) Standards for access to the grievance case file, including timely access, accessible formats, and identification of information considered, relied upon, or generated in connection with the grievance.

(4) Standards for department review of resolution plans, including factors the department shall consider in determining if a resolution plan is appropriate to the grievance.

(5) Procedures for corrective action, monitoring, technical assistance, and other actions necessary to address repeated or systemic violations.

(6) Standards for identifying and addressing conflicts of interest, including conflicts involving service providers who file or assist with grievances, regional center or state-operated facility staff who review grievances, and department staff who review resolution plans.

(7) Standards to implement subdivision (e) of Section 4891, including a definition of retaliation, examples of prohibited retaliation or threats of retaliation, procedures for preventing and responding to retaliation, and interim protections and corrective actions available when retaliation is alleged or substantiated.

(8) A definition of good
 cause for an individual to request review by the department more than 15 days following receipt of a resolution plan pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 4891.

(b) These written directives or similar instructions shall be valid until regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than January 31, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 48.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.7. PROTECTION AND ADVOCACY AGENCY [4900. - 4906.]



CHAPTER 1. Definitions [4900. - 4906.]

4900.

(a) The definitions contained in this section govern the construction of this division, unless the context requires otherwise. These definitions do not alter or impact the definitions or other provisions of the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600)), or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750), of Part 3 of Division 9.

(b) “Abuse” means any of the following:

(1) An act, or failure to act, that would constitute abuse as that term is defined in federal regulations pertaining to the authority of protection and advocacy agencies, including Section 51.2 of Title 42 of
 the Code of Federal Regulations or Section 1326.19 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) An act, or failure to act, that would constitute abuse as that term is defined in Section 15610.07 of this code or Section 11165.6 of the Penal Code.

(3) An act, or failure to act, that was performed, or not performed, knowingly, recklessly, or intentionally, and that caused, or may have caused, injury or death to an individual with disabilities, which includes, but is not limited to, verbal, nonverbal, mental, and emotional harassment; rape or sexual assault; striking; the use of excessive force when placing the individual in bodily restraints; the use of bodily or chemical restraints that is not in compliance with federal and state laws and regulations, or any
 other practice that is likely to cause immediate physical or psychological harm or result in long-term harm if the practice continues.

(4) Any other violation of an individual’s legal rights determined, in its discretion, by the protection and advocacy agency to be abuse, including, but not limited to, subjecting an individual to significant financial exploitation.

(c) “Complaint” has the same meaning as “complaint” as defined in federal statutes and regulations pertaining to the authority of protection and advocacy agencies, including Section 10802(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, Section 51.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or Section 1386.19 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A “complaint” includes, but is not limited
 to, any report or communication, whether formal or informal, or written or oral, received by the protection and advocacy agency, including, but not limited to, media accounts, newspaper articles, electronic communications, and telephone calls, including anonymous telephone calls, from any source alleging abuse or neglect of an individual with a disability.

(d) “Disability” means a developmental disability, as defined in Section 15002(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a mental illness, as defined in Section 10802(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code, a disability within the meaning of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as defined in Section 12102(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or a disability within the meaning of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8
 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as defined in subdivision (j) or (l) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(e) “Facility” or “program” means a public or private facility, program, or service provider providing services, support, care, or treatment to persons with disabilities, even if only on an as-needed basis or under contractual arrangement. “Facility,” “program,” or “service provider” includes, but is not limited to, a hospital, a long-term health care facility, a community living arrangement for people with disabilities, including a group home, a board and care home, an individual residence or apartment of a person with a disability where services are provided, a day program, a juvenile detention facility, a homeless shelter, a facility used to house or detain persons for the
 purpose of civil immigration proceedings, a jail, or a prison, including all general areas, as well as special, mental health, or forensic units. The term includes any facility licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code and any facility that is unlicensed but is not exempt from licensure as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1503.5 of the Health and Safety Code. The term also includes, but is not limited to, a public or private school or other institution or program providing education, training, habilitation, recreation, therapeutic, or residential services to persons with disabilities.

(f) (1) (A) “Guardian,” “conservator,” “limited conservator,” or “legal representative” means a person, including the parent of a disabled minor who has legal
 custody of the minor, appointed by a state court or an authorized agency, as appropriate, or otherwise authorized by law, and regularly reviewed by the appointing court or agency, if required by law, to represent and advocate for the legal rights and interests of a person with a disability.

(B) These terms do not include a person acting solely as a representative payee, a person acting solely to handle financial matters, an executor or administrator of an estate, an attorney or other person acting on behalf of an individual with a disability solely in individual legal matters, or an official or the official’s designee who is responsible for the provision of treatment, services, supports, or other assistance to an individual with a disability.

(2) With respect to an individual
 described under paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or legal representative is the person with the legal authority to consent to health or mental health care or treatment on behalf of the individual.

(3) With respect to an individual described under paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (i), the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or legal representative is the person with the legal authority to make all decisions on behalf of the individual.

(g) “Neglect” means any of the following:

(1) A negligent act, or omission to act, that would constitute neglect as that term is defined in federal statutes and regulations pertaining to the authority of protection and advocacy
 agencies, including Section 10802(5) of Title 42 of the United States Code, Section 51.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or Section 1326.19 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) A negligent act, or omission to act, that would constitute
 neglect as that term is defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15610.07 of this code or Section 11165.2 of the Penal Code.

(3) A negligent act, or omission to act, by an individual responsible for providing services, supports, or other assistance that caused, or may have caused, injury or death to an individual with a disability or that placed an individual with a disability at risk of injury or death, and includes, but is not limited to, the failure to establish or carry out an appropriate individual program plan or treatment plan, which includes a discharge plan; provide adequate nutrition, clothing, or health care to an individual with a disability; or provide a safe environment, which may include failing to maintain an adequate number of trained staff or failing to take appropriate steps to prevent self-abuse, harassment,
 or assault by a peer.

(h) “Probable cause” to believe that an individual has been or may be subject to abuse or neglect or that the health or safety of the individual is in serious and immediate jeopardy, exists when the protection and advocacy agency determines that it is objectively reasonable for a person to entertain that belief. The individual making a probable cause determination may base the decision on reasonable inferences drawn from their experience or training regarding similar incidents, conditions, or problems that are usually associated with abuse or neglect. Information supporting a probable cause determination may result from monitoring or other activities, including, but not limited to, media reports and newspaper articles.

(i) “Protection and advocacy agency” means the
 private nonprofit corporation designated by the Governor in this state pursuant to federal law for the protection and advocacy of the rights of persons with disabilities, including the following:

(1) People with developmental disabilities, as authorized under the federal Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, contained in Chapter 144 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) People with mental illness, as authorized under the federal Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Amendments Act of 1991, contained in Chapter 114 (commencing with Section 10801) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) People with disabilities within the meaning of the
 federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) as defined in Section 12102(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, who do not have a developmental disability as defined in Section 15002(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code, people with a mental illness as defined in Section 10802(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and who are receiving services under the federal Protection and Advocacy of Individual Rights Act as defined in Section 794e of Title 29 of the United States Code, or people with a disability within the meaning of the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), as defined in subdivision (j) or (l) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(j) “Reasonable unaccompanied access” means
 access that permits the protection and advocacy agency, without undue interference, to monitor, inspect, and observe conditions in facilities and programs, to meet and communicate with residents and service recipients privately and confidentially on a regular basis, formally or informally, including, but not limited to, by telephone, mail, electronic mail, and in person, and to review records privately and confidentially, in a manner that minimizes interference with the activities of the facility, program, or service provider that respects privacy interests and honors requests to terminate an interview, and that does not jeopardize the physical health or safety of facility, program, or service provider staff, individuals with disabilities, service recipients, or protection and advocacy agency staff. Except as otherwise required by law, the protection and advocacy agency shall not be required to provide the
 name or other identifying information regarding the individual with a disability or staff with whom it plans to meet or justify or explain its interactions with those persons. Upon request of facility staff, the protection and advocacy agency shall provide the specific location or locations at a facility where it intends to monitor, inspect, or observe conditions and meet and communicate with residents or staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 548, Sec. 1.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

(a) The protection and advocacy agency, for purposes of this division, shall be a private nonprofit corporation and shall meet all of the requirements of federal law applicable to protection and advocacy systems, including, but not limited to, the requirement that it establish a grievance procedure for clients or prospective clients of the system to ensure that people with disabilities have full access to services of the system.

(b) State officers and employees, in taking any action relating to the protection and advocacy agency, shall meet the requirements of federal law applicable to protection and advocacy systems.

(c) The authority of the protection and advocacy agency set forth in this division shall not diminish the authority of the protection and advocacy agency under federal statutes pertaining to the authority of protection and advocacy systems, or under federal rules and regulations adopted in implementation of those statutes.

(d) Nothing in this division shall be construed to supplant the jurisdiction or the responsibilities of adult protective services programs pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600), or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750), of Part 3 of Division 9.

(e) (1) Nothing in this division shall be construed to supplant the duties or authority of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 9700) of Division 8.5.

(2) The protection and advocacy agency shall cooperate with the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman when appropriate, as provided in Section 9717.

(f) (1) Nothing in this division shall be construed to alter or impact the Elder and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600), or Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750), of Part 3 of Division 9, including the confidentiality requirements of Section 15633 and the legal responsibility of the protection and advocacy agency to report elder or dependent adult abuse or neglect as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15630.

(2) The adult protective services agency shall retain the responsibility to investigate any report of abuse or neglect in accordance with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 15750) of Part 3 of Division 9 when the reported abuse or neglect is within the jurisdiction of the adult protective services agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 878, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

(a) The protection and advocacy agency, in protecting and advocating for the rights of people with disabilities, pursuant to the federal mandate, may exercise any authority specified in this section when one or more of the following occurs:

(1) The agency receives a complaint or report of alleged abuse or neglect, or of an incident in which an individual is in serious and immediate jeopardy.

(2) The agency determines that probable cause exists that an individual has been or may be subject to abuse or neglect.

(3) The
 agency determines that the health or safety of an individual is in serious and immediate jeopardy.

(b) If subdivision (a) applies, the protections and advocacy agency may exercise the authority granted pursuant to subdivision (a) to do all of the following:

(1) Investigate any incident of alleged abuse or neglect of any person with a disability. This authority includes reasonable unaccompanied access to a facility, program, or service provider, and authority to examine all relevant records and interview any facility, program, or service provider recipient, employee, or other person who may have knowledge of the alleged abuse or neglect.

(2) Pursue administrative, legal,
 and other appropriate remedies or approaches to ensure the protection of the rights of people with disabilities.

(3) Provide information and training on, and referral to, programs and services addressing the needs of people with disabilities, including information and training regarding individual rights and the services available from the protection and advocacy agency.

(4) Monitor a facility’s, program’s, or service provider’s compliance with respect to the rights and safety of individuals with disabilities.

(c) The protection and advocacy agency and its authorized agents shall, in addition, have reasonable unaccompanied access to public or private facilities, programs, and service providers, including all
 areas of the facility, program, or service providers’ premises that are used by, or accessible to, individuals with disabilities and reasonable unaccompanied access to those persons.

(1) (A) The protection and advocacy agency shall have reasonable unaccompanied
 access to all public or private facilities, programs, or service providers, including to users of those facilities, programs, and services, at all times as are necessary, and without advance notice, to investigate incidents of alleged abuse and neglect in accord with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(B) Access pursuant to this paragraph includes the opportunity to interview any individual with a disability, employee, or other person, including a person alleged to be the victim of abuse, who might be reasonably believed by the protection and advocacy agency to have knowledge of an incident under investigation. Except as otherwise required by law, the protection and advocacy agency shall not be required to provide the name or other identifying information regarding any individual with a disability or staff with
 whom it plans to meet or to justify or explain its interactions with those persons.

(C) Access to an individual pursuant to this paragraph shall be afforded immediately, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), upon request.

(2) The protection and advocacy agency shall have reasonable unaccompanied access during reasonable times, which, at a minimum, includes normal working hours and visiting hours, for other advocacy services. Protection and advocacy agency activities shall be conducted so as to minimize interference with service provider programs, respect individuals with disabilities’ privacy interests, and honor a recipient’s request to terminate an interview. This access includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Providing information and training on, and referral to programs addressing the needs of, individuals with disabilities, and information and training on individual rights and the protection and advocacy services available from the agency, including, but not limited to, the name, address, and telephone number of the protection and advocacy agency. The protection and advocacy agency shall be permitted to post, in an area in which individuals with disabilities receive services, a poster that identifies the services available from the protection and advocacy agency and the name, address, and telephone number of the protection and advocacy agency.

(B) Monitoring compliance with respect to the rights and safety of residents or service recipients.

(C) Inspecting,
 viewing, and photographing all areas of the facility, program, or service provider’s premises that are used by individuals with disabilities, or that are accessible to them, but does not include photographing or video recording individuals with disabilities without their consent.

(3) (A) If the protection and advocacy agency’s access to facilities, programs, service providers, service recipients, or individual with a disability is delayed or denied by a facility, program, or service provider, the facility, program, or service provider shall promptly provide the agency with a written statement of reasons. In the case of denial of access for alleged lack of authorization, the facility, program, or service provider shall promptly
 provide to the agency the name, address, and telephone number of the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative of the individual with a disability for whom authorization is required. Access to a facility, program, service provider, service recipient, or individual with a disability shall not be delayed or denied without the prompt provision of a written statement of the reasons for the denial.

(B) A facility, program, or service provider shall not be required to afford immediate access if complying with the request would interfere with treatment or therapy to be provided to an individual with a disability. If access to an individual must be delayed beyond 24 hours to allow for the provision of treatment or therapy, the protection and advocacy agency shall receive access as soon as possible thereafter.

(C) If a facility, program, or service provider denies the protection and advocacy agency’s access to an individual with a disability on the grounds specified in subparagraph (B), the facility, program, or service provider shall, within 24 hours of the request, provide the protection and advocacy agency with a written statement from a physician, or, in the case of a state-operated mental health facility, a member of the treatment team, stating that access to the individual will interfere with the individual’s treatment or therapy, and the time and circumstances under which the protection and advocacy agency can interview the individual. If the
 physician, or, in the case of a state-operated mental health facility, a member of the treatment team, states that the individual cannot be interviewed within 24 hours of the protection and advocacy agency being provided the written statement, the protection and advocacy agency and the facility, program, or service provider shall engage in a good faith interactive process to determine when, and under what circumstances, the individual may be interviewed. If the protection and advocacy agency and the facility, program, or service provider are unable to agree upon the time and circumstance, they shall select a mutually agreeable independent physician, or, in the case of a state-operated mental health facility, a mutually
 agreeable physician employed by a state-operated mental health facility who does not have a history of treating the patient, who will determine when, and under what circumstances, the individual may be
 interviewed. The expense of the independent physician’s services shall be paid for by the facility, program, or service provider. Individuals with disabilities subject to the requirements in this paragraph include adults and minors who have guardians, limited conservators, conservators, or other legal representatives.

(d) The protection and advocacy agency shall be permitted to attend treatment planning meetings concerning individuals with disabilities, with the consent of the individual or the individual’s guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative, except that consent is not required if the individual, due to
 their mental or physical condition, is unable to authorize the protection and advocacy agency to have access to a treatment planning meeting and either the individual does not have a guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative, or the individual’s guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative is the state or one of its political subdivisions. The protection and advocacy agency shall not attend treatment planning meetings if the individual objects on the individual’s own behalf to the protection and advocacy agency’s attendance at the treatment planning meetings.

(e) The protection and advocacy agency shall not enter an individual residence or apartment of a client or the client’s family without the consent of
 an adult occupant. In the absence of this consent, the protection and advocacy agency may enter only if it has obtained the legal authority to enforce its access authority pursuant to legal remedies available under this division or applicable federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 548, Sec. 2.   (SB 398)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

(a) The protection and advocacy agency shall have access to the records of any of the following people with disabilities:

(1) Any person who is a client of the agency, or any person who has requested assistance from the agency, if that person or the agent designated by that person, or the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative of that person, has authorized the protection and advocacy agency to have access to the records and information. If a person with a disability who is able to authorize the protection and advocacy agency to access their records expressly denies this access after being informed by the protection and advocacy agency of their
 right to authorize or deny access, the protection and advocacy agency shall not have
 access to that person’s records.

(2) Any person, including any individual who cannot be located, to whom all of the following conditions apply:

(A) The individual, due to their mental or physical condition, is unable to authorize the protection and advocacy agency to have access to their records.

(B) The individual does not have a guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative, or the individual’s representative is a public entity, including the state or one of its political subdivisions.

(C) The protection and advocacy agency is authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4902 to exercise the authority specified
 in that section.
